District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.04

Third party rights.

The right of a third party to purchase an accommodation is conditional upon exercise of tenant rights under this subchapter. The time periods for negotiation of a contract of sale and for settlement under this subchapter are minimum periods, and the owner may afford the tenants a reasonable extension of such period, without liability under a third party contract. Third party purchasers are presumed to act with full knowledge of tenant rights and public policy under this subchapter.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 404, 27 DCR 2975
This section is referenced in § 42-3404.12.
1981 Ed., § 45-1633.
Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.